src/lexica/__backup__/adj.lexc
!!!adj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Comp +Supr +Nom

LEXICON Root
AdjPrefix;
Adj;

LEXICON AdjPrefix
+Neg:نا^ Adj;
+Neg:بی^ Adj;‌

LEXICON AdjInf
+Adj:0 #;
!Comparative and Superlative
+Adj+Comp:^تر #;
+Adj+Supr:^ترین #;
!Derivational morphology
+Adj+Nom:^ی #; ! abstract nouns
+Adj+Nom:^ان #;
+Adj+Nom:^ا #;
!Pronominal enclitics
+Adj+Poss+1P+Sg:^م #;
+Adj+Poss+2P+Sg:^ت #;
+Adj+Poss+3P+Sg:^ش #;
+Adj+Poss+1P+Pl:^مان #;
+Adj+Poss+2P+Pl:^تان #;
+Adj+Poss+3P+Pl:^شان #;
!Inferred
+Adj:^ترم #;
+Adj:^اتان #;
+Adj:^یشان #;
+Adj:^تر #;
+Adj:^ی‌اش #;
+Adj:^انی #;
+Adj:^ها #;
+Adj:^ترش #;
+Adj:^یتان #;
+Adj:^ت #;
+Adj:^ای‌اش #;
+Adj:^ین #;
+Adj:^یم #;
+Adj:^یی #;
+Adj:^ی‌تر #;
+Adj:^ام #;
+Adj:^یت #;
+Adj:^ترینش #;
+Adj:^ای #;
+Adj:^ی‌ام #;
+Adj:^ه #;
+Adj:^اش #;
+Adj:^ات #;
+Adj:^تری #;
+Adj:^یش #;
+Adj:^مند #;
+Adj:^ترند #;
+Adj:^یمان #;

LEXICON Adj
زبان	AdjInf;
جداگانه	AdjInf;
شهیر	AdjInf;
مفلوک	AdjInf;
مطلع	AdjInf;
نمدی	AdjInf;
دولتی	AdjInf;
مصون	AdjInf;
تند	AdjInf;
شریک	AdjInf;
ناپاک	AdjInf;
دوازده‌گانه	AdjInf;
سرپوشیده	AdjInf;
وجودی	AdjInf;
مربوط	AdjInf;
بینوا	AdjInf;
خیلی	AdjInf;
دربرگیرنده	AdjInf;
شبح‌وار	AdjInf;
آفتابی	AdjInf;
چنگال‌مانند	AdjInf;
اشتر	AdjInf;
مصمم	AdjInf;
مبتکر	AdjInf;
شکرگزار	AdjInf;
تیره‌روزز	AdjInf;
متمرکز	AdjInf;
مشقی	AdjInf;
مقبول‌الشهاده	AdjInf;
ناشی‌زاد	AdjInf;
پارک‌شده	AdjInf;
مهرآمیز	AdjInf;
آکنده	AdjInf;
یادشده	AdjInf;
آبادانی	AdjInf;
استخراج	AdjInf;
موازی	AdjInf;
آستیگمات	AdjInf;
فرا	AdjInf;
گمراه	AdjInf;
گردگرفته	AdjInf;
آتشی	AdjInf;
محرم	AdjInf;
کم‌نور	AdjInf;
گفتمانی	AdjInf;
ناخوشایند	AdjInf;
جنگ‌طلب	AdjInf;
فریبنده	AdjInf;
علاوه	AdjInf;
پرخنده	AdjInf;
حرام‌گوشت	AdjInf;
نامحسوس	AdjInf;
دار	AdjInf;
محترمانه	AdjInf;
مادری	AdjInf;
دبستانی	AdjInf;
پیکربندی‌نشده	AdjInf;
دیکتاتوری	AdjInf;
خلاق	AdjInf;
تبلیغی	AdjInf;
دامی	AdjInf;
آلبالویی‌رنگ	AdjInf;
آفتاب‌رو	AdjInf;
بورسی	AdjInf;
سرطانی	AdjInf;
چشمگیر	AdjInf;
یگانه	AdjInf;
خورده	AdjInf;
هزارچهره	AdjInf;
ناگهانی	AdjInf;
جدید	AdjInf;
فجیع	AdjInf;
اثنی‌عشری	AdjInf;
جدیدی	AdjInf;
کارکردی	AdjInf;
بی‌قیاس	AdjInf;
غایی	AdjInf;
بادبانی	AdjInf;
پاک	AdjInf;
مشتاقانه	AdjInf;
کامل	AdjInf;
انتزاع	AdjInf;
آروماتیک	AdjInf;
همیشگی	AdjInf;
کمونیست	AdjInf;
جادو	AdjInf;
مدیره	AdjInf;
جسمی	AdjInf;
کمرنگ	AdjInf;
فیمابین	AdjInf;
توهین	AdjInf;
پخته‌شده	AdjInf;
هوشیار	AdjInf;
متحجر	AdjInf;
گناهکار	AdjInf;
مشکل	AdjInf;
کور	AdjInf;
امن	AdjInf;
پاتوژن	AdjInf;
طولانی	AdjInf;
تولیدکننده	AdjInf;
موشکی	AdjInf;
محض	AdjInf;
قومی	AdjInf;
معین	AdjInf;
صیادی	AdjInf;
باتقوی	AdjInf;
متحمل	AdjInf;
پاسخ‌گویی‌شده	AdjInf;
کینه‌توز	AdjInf;
بی‌نام	AdjInf;
شده	AdjInf;
طراح	AdjInf;
منحصر	AdjInf;
انتخابیه	AdjInf;
ناصالح	AdjInf;
محدود	AdjInf;
باطنیه	AdjInf;
ملاردی	AdjInf;
عالم	AdjInf;
منشیانه	AdjInf;
روان	AdjInf;
غیرمحسوس	AdjInf;
مسلمان	AdjInf;
کم‌نور	AdjInf;
بدمزه	AdjInf;
نقاش	AdjInf;
حق	AdjInf;
گران‌قیمت	AdjInf;
خاشع	AdjInf;
پرتغالی	AdjInf;
فلکی	AdjInf;
جنینی	AdjInf;
مطلقه	AdjInf;
جوان	AdjInf;
خداپرست	AdjInf;
مهرورزانه	AdjInf;
دلتنگ	AdjInf;
مفید	AdjInf;
آنلاین	AdjInf;
تازه‌دم	AdjInf;
بلوند	AdjInf;
بلوکه	AdjInf;
نقلی	AdjInf;
بنیادگرانه	AdjInf;
احمر	AdjInf;
مصدوم	AdjInf;
نامعلوم	AdjInf;
فروزان	AdjInf;
کاربری	AdjInf;
آتشین	AdjInf;
هم‌نفس	AdjInf;
عصیانگر	AdjInf;
عجین	AdjInf;
آمده	AdjInf;
کنجکاوی	AdjInf;
ناکرده	AdjInf;
جنگنده	AdjInf;
عقده‌ای	AdjInf;
دائمی	AdjInf;
دانست#دان	AdjInf;
مکرر	AdjInf;
موثق	AdjInf;
هم‌مصاف	AdjInf;
تمام‌وقت	AdjInf;
شالوده‌ای	AdjInf;
صورتی	AdjInf;
مکانیکی	AdjInf;
عاجل	AdjInf;
ممنوعه	AdjInf;
همیشگی	AdjInf;
خبیثانه	AdjInf;
معنوی	AdjInf;
بی‌بدیل	AdjInf;
پرستیدنی	AdjInf;
اهدایی	AdjInf;
خموش	AdjInf;
کم‌مصرف	AdjInf;
سیاه‌رنگ	AdjInf;
هرز	AdjInf;
پرفشار	AdjInf;
عقب‌مانده	AdjInf;
ساخته	AdjInf;
سیستماتیک	AdjInf;
رئیسه	AdjInf;
بالغ	AdjInf;
حیاتی	AdjInf;
ضدسرفه	AdjInf;
فوریتی	AdjInf;
موثق	AdjInf;
نابه‌جا	AdjInf;
دایمی	AdjInf;
معدود	AdjInf;
قانونی	AdjInf;
خودی	AdjInf;
دوزانو	AdjInf;
سر	AdjInf;
اشتعال‌پذیر	AdjInf;
اسفبار	AdjInf;
ریسک‌گریز	AdjInf;
نکره	AdjInf;
قدرت‌طلب	AdjInf;
بازنشست	AdjInf;
پرورشی	AdjInf;
غمگنانه	AdjInf;
تابیده	AdjInf;
فردی	AdjInf;
ذله	AdjInf;
وحشی	AdjInf;
یک‌جانبه	AdjInf;
متمول	AdjInf;
نفری	AdjInf;
معین	AdjInf;
عامه	AdjInf;
رواشده	AdjInf;
خشک‌مغز	AdjInf;
غیرغذایی	AdjInf;
عاجزانه	AdjInf;
فیل‌سوار	AdjInf;
ملی	AdjInf;
بلامنازع	AdjInf;
غیرتعاونی	AdjInf;
گلدار	AdjInf;
بعد	AdjInf;
طاهره	AdjInf;
دنیاپرست	AdjInf;
صدرنشین	AdjInf;
ایران‌دوست	AdjInf;
کامپیوتری	AdjInf;
اکتسابی	AdjInf;
مانده	AdjInf;
فاتح	AdjInf;
جاده‌رو	AdjInf;
توریستی	AdjInf;
کوپرنیکی	AdjInf;
مگس‌خوار	AdjInf;
شهرستانی	AdjInf;
خلافکار	AdjInf;
ویدیویی	AdjInf;
برکنار	AdjInf;
دوکلاجه	AdjInf;
اکرم	AdjInf;
امروزی	AdjInf;
بازنهاده	AdjInf;
اندک	AdjInf;
اضطرابی	AdjInf;
محرکه	AdjInf;
نیم‌مست	AdjInf;
نگهدارنده	AdjInf;
اشغال‌شده	AdjInf;
نوکرمآب	AdjInf;
غیرمعتبر	AdjInf;
دشتستانی	AdjInf;
کاذب	AdjInf;
خواهان	AdjInf;
یمنی	AdjInf;
شاداب	AdjInf;
بستری	AdjInf;
خلقی	AdjInf;
دستوری	AdjInf;
خالی‌شده	AdjInf;
صبحگاهی	AdjInf;
اصلاح‌طلب	AdjInf;
شیک	AdjInf;
متمرد	AdjInf;
بی‌پاسخ	AdjInf;
فروسرخ	AdjInf;
خطرناک	AdjInf;
ضدپیری	AdjInf;
آسان	AdjInf;
شهادت‌گونه	AdjInf;
رو	AdjInf;
کمونیستی	AdjInf;
چهارگانه	AdjInf;
شرب	AdjInf;
طیب	AdjInf;
اقتصاددان	AdjInf;
هراسان	AdjInf;
تاویل‌کننده	AdjInf;
نامدار	AdjInf;
عظیم‌الجثه	AdjInf;
وکالتی	AdjInf;
کنه‌کش	AdjInf;
پف‌کرده	AdjInf;
مزبوره	AdjInf;
انسان‌دوست	AdjInf;
زینبی	AdjInf;
چالشی	AdjInf;
ریایی	AdjInf;
سلطه‌جو	AdjInf;
آن	AdjInf;
خیس	AdjInf;
متنی	AdjInf;
ارادی	AdjInf;
آبی‌رنگ	AdjInf;
کلان	AdjInf;
احمقانه	AdjInf;
عشایر	AdjInf;
صهیونیست	AdjInf;
بی‌روح	AdjInf;
کذابه	AdjInf;
دیداری	AdjInf;
هراسناک	AdjInf;
جعلی	AdjInf;
دزدانه	AdjInf;
پهناور	AdjInf;
آفتاب‌گیر	AdjInf;
آب‌پز	AdjInf;
مطول	AdjInf;
تکه‌ای	AdjInf;
بریده	AdjInf;
مهیمن	AdjInf;
زنده‌شده	AdjInf;
پرکار	AdjInf;
نارنجی	AdjInf;
درآمده	AdjInf;
گریبان‌گیر	AdjInf;
بشردوستانه	AdjInf;
کم‌حاصل	AdjInf;
حماسه‌آفرین	AdjInf;
سیاهپوش	AdjInf;
شایع	AdjInf;
مهم	AdjInf;
مطالعه‌شده	AdjInf;
سریع‌السیر	AdjInf;
روباتیکی	AdjInf;
زبانی	AdjInf;
ضدانقلاب	AdjInf;
پاک‌نفس	AdjInf;
بی‌دوام	AdjInf;
عوضی	AdjInf;
کاشی	AdjInf;
تمام‌شده	AdjInf;
خودساخته	AdjInf;
آریایی	AdjInf;
غفور	AdjInf;
ورزش	AdjInf;
کورکورانه	AdjInf;
باخدا	AdjInf;
غشایی	AdjInf;
علیهم‌السلام	AdjInf;
بتنی	AdjInf;
هادی	AdjInf;
کوچنده	AdjInf;
فرار	AdjInf;
مدیریتی	AdjInf;
عملی	AdjInf;
سفید	AdjInf;
صهیونیستی	AdjInf;
تشکیلاتی	AdjInf;
درازمدت	AdjInf;
مهارتی	AdjInf;
جدا	AdjInf;
شناسایی‌شده	AdjInf;
واقف	AdjInf;
علیه‌السلام	AdjInf;
خودکار	AdjInf;
استقلال‌خواهانه	AdjInf;
رفیع	AdjInf;
کتابخانه‌ای	AdjInf;
تاریک	AdjInf;
مخابراتی	AdjInf;
متبرک	AdjInf;
درون‌حزبی	AdjInf;
سهل	AdjInf;
مساعد	AdjInf;
هموار	AdjInf;
عرب‌زبان	AdjInf;
ابلهانه	AdjInf;
آزادمرد	AdjInf;
سرازیر	AdjInf;
مسرور	AdjInf;
آلرژی‌زا	AdjInf;
تاجیکی	AdjInf;
متخاصم	AdjInf;
نایلونی	AdjInf;
پیچیده	AdjInf;
انتحارکننده	AdjInf;
بی‌مهابا	AdjInf;
حسابی	AdjInf;
بدکنش	AdjInf;
پرهندوانه	AdjInf;
نیازمند	AdjInf;
میان‌بر	AdjInf;
کیلویی	AdjInf;
خصمانه	AdjInf;
بازمانده	AdjInf;
زن‌باز	AdjInf;
مرغوب	AdjInf;
وقیحانه	AdjInf;
خزانی	AdjInf;
انسانیه	AdjInf;
مشرف	AdjInf;
عاشق	AdjInf;
مطلوب	AdjInf;
ادواری	AdjInf;
انجام	AdjInf;
الهی	AdjInf;
شرافتمندانه	AdjInf;
نازل	AdjInf;
آهنین	AdjInf;
اسقاط	AdjInf;
الزام	AdjInf;
شور	AdjInf;
ناگوار	AdjInf;
دهم	AdjInf;
فیزیکی	AdjInf;
عارفانه	AdjInf;
کم‌بهره	AdjInf;
پارسی	AdjInf;
کشته‌شده	AdjInf;
ویرایشی	AdjInf;
پیوسته	AdjInf;
فدرال	AdjInf;
افغان	AdjInf;
مقعر	AdjInf;
قسطی	AdjInf;
پر	AdjInf;
سنتی	AdjInf;
دووجهی	AdjInf;
مدل	AdjInf;
شنوا	AdjInf;
مصنوع	AdjInf;
حامی	AdjInf;
بی‌واسطه	AdjInf;
خرسند	AdjInf;
آغازین	AdjInf;
فقرزده	AdjInf;
جهان‌آفرین	AdjInf;
بی‌شمار	AdjInf;
معقول	AdjInf;
علیهاالسلام	AdjInf;
شیرخواره	AdjInf;
یک‌سره	AdjInf;
فراموش‌شده	AdjInf;
ملانوسیتی	AdjInf;
سیار	AdjInf;
خشک‌شده	AdjInf;
اصول‌گرا	AdjInf;
واجب	AdjInf;
دلسرد	AdjInf;
معین‌شده	AdjInf;
بلژیکی	AdjInf;
سینمایی	AdjInf;
دوست	AdjInf;
بنیادین	AdjInf;
مجلل	AdjInf;
هراس	AdjInf;
بی‌سرپرست	AdjInf;
زایا	AdjInf;
پیکارگر	AdjInf;
ظاهربین	AdjInf;
سمج	AdjInf;
تحصیلی	AdjInf;
غیررسمی	AdjInf;
مجید	AdjInf;
ارزشی	AdjInf;
همفکر	AdjInf;
دوستانه	AdjInf;
مادرمرده	AdjInf;
خوشمزه	AdjInf;
جوگیر	AdjInf;
درخور	AdjInf;
غیراستاندارد	AdjInf;
سوختی	AdjInf;
خریداری‌شده	AdjInf;
استمراری	AdjInf;
اجرایی	AdjInf;
صحیح	AdjInf;
وحیانی	AdjInf;
آفتاب‌سوخته	AdjInf;
چیتی	AdjInf;
منقوش	AdjInf;
مکلف	AdjInf;
سخت‌کوش	AdjInf;
توجیه‌کننده	AdjInf;
سوم	AdjInf;
بلوچی	AdjInf;
نابغه	AdjInf;
بی‌رمق	AdjInf;
ستم‌دیده	AdjInf;
خیس‌شده	AdjInf;
ستاره‌بار	AdjInf;
بشارتی	AdjInf;
درشت	AdjInf;
وقایع‌گزار	AdjInf;
چشم‌نواز	AdjInf;
نهادینه	AdjInf;
واهی	AdjInf;
لسانی	AdjInf;
نفره	AdjInf;
قبلی	AdjInf;
افزوده	AdjInf;
سرکوب‌شده	AdjInf;
مطروح	AdjInf;
سیراب	AdjInf;
کمی	AdjInf;
میتوکندریال	AdjInf;
ندانسته	AdjInf;
مینوی	AdjInf;
عشایری	AdjInf;
دردآلود	AdjInf;
مخلصانه	AdjInf;
دست‌جمعی	AdjInf;
هیدرولیک	AdjInf;
صعودی	AdjInf;
فرنگ	AdjInf;
ساحلی	AdjInf;
اعتدالی	AdjInf;
نرم‌تن	AdjInf;
سترون	AdjInf;
دنیازده	AdjInf;
بازدیدی	AdjInf;
شریف	AdjInf;
آفریقایی	AdjInf;
شیطنت‌آمیز	AdjInf;
پیروزمند	AdjInf;
جدید	AdjInf;
غم‌زده	AdjInf;
کیفی	AdjInf;
جاری	AdjInf;
تجسمی	AdjInf;
خوراکی	AdjInf;
بدبخت	AdjInf;
باعث	AdjInf;
مسلمانی	AdjInf;
دوستدار	AdjInf;
خودفروش	AdjInf;
